Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 32.1-325.001.
Expired.

Editor’s note.

Former §

32.1-325.001

, pertaining to asset verification for applicants and recipients of medical assistance; financial institutions to disclose certain records, was enacted by Acts 2015, c. 652, and expired July 1, 2017, pursuant to Acts 2015, c. 652, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-325.01.
Certain term life insurance considered resources.

When making eligibility determinations for institutional or community-based care to be paid for by the Department, the Department shall consider as an uncompensated transfer all resources that are used by an applicant to purchase any term life insurance policy that does not have a benefit payable at death that will equal or exceed twice the sum of all premiums paid for such policy if such policy was purchased within thirty months prior to the date of application for assistance.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to term life insurance policies for pre-need funerals pursuant to § 54.1-2820, except that any benefits paid under such policy in excess of such actual expenses shall be subject to recovery by the Department of Medical Assistance Services for Medicaid payments made on behalf of the deceased insured.
The provisions of this section shall not apply to any term life insurance policies purchased prior to the effective date of this law.

History.

1993, c. 990.

§ 32.1-325.02.
Determinations of assets; disclaimers of interests to be considered uncompensated transfers of assets for Medicaid eligibility purposes under certain circumstances.

When determining eligibility for medical assistance services, “assets” means, in regard to an individual, all income and resources of the individual and the individual’s spouse, including, but not limited to, any income or resources which the individual or such individual’s spouse is or becomes entitled to, but does not receive, because of any action by such individual or such individual’s spouse, or by a person, including a court or administrative body, with legal authority to act in the place of or on behalf of the individual or such individual’s spouse, or by any person, including any court or administrative body, acting at the direction of or upon the request of the individual or such individual’s spouse.

For the sole purpose of determining eligibility for medical assistance services as provided in this title, Chapter 5 (§

63.2-500

et seq.) of Title 63.2, and the regulations of the Department of Medical Assistance Services, any disclaimer of succession pursuant to Chapter 26 (§

64.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 64.2 shall be considered an uncompensated transfer of assets equal to the value of any interest disclaimed by any person who would, by reason of the disclaimer of succession, retain Medicaid eligibility or become eligible for medical assistance within (i) 36 months of the date that the disclaimer instrument is filed with a court of competent jurisdiction when the disclaimer instrument relates to any property other than property passed through a trust or (ii) 60 months of the date that the disclaimer instrument is filed with a court of competent jurisdiction when the disclaimer instrument relates to payments from a trust or portions of a trust.

History.

1994, c. 765; 2003, c. 253.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 506 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Medical Assistances Services shall increase the maximum allowable gross earnings for individuals participating in the Medicaid Works program established pursuant to § 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XV) of the Social Security Act to the maximum gross income amount allowed by the Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999 (P.L. 106-170) that does not trigger collection of mandatory premiums.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Chapter 8.1 (§ 64.1-196.1 et seq.) of Title 64.1” was changed to “Chapter 26 (§

64.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 64.2” to conform to the recodification of Title 64.1 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 253 substituted “Chapter 8.1 (§ 64.1-196.1 et seq.)” for “Chapter 8 (§ 64.1-188 et seq.)” in subsection B; substituted “36” for “thirty-six” in clause B (i); and substituted “60” for “sixty” in clause B (ii).

§ 32.1-325.03.
Legal presence required for certain state and local public benefits; exceptions; definitions; proof of legal presence.

In addition to meeting the existing eligibility requirements of the benefits applied for, no person who is not a United States Citizen or legally present in the United States shall receive medical services under this chapter, except for the following:

Medicaid benefits for those residing in long-term institutional facilities or participating in home and community based waivers on June 30, 1997, who were eligible for full Medicaid benefits shall continue to be eligible for Medicaid benefits at state expense if federal financial participation is not available;

Medicaid benefits for those who because of alien requirements pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193) (i) are under the age of 19 years and (ii) would be eligible for full Medicaid benefits if the alien requirements prior to the passage of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 were still in effect. However, such person upon reaching the age of 19 years shall comply with the provisions of this section; and

State or local public benefits that are mandated by Federal Law pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1621.

The determination of eligibility for public benefits as provided in this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of §

63.2-503.1

, as applicable.

History.

2005, cc. 867, 876.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 867 and 876, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2006.”

Acts 2005, cc. 867 and 876, cl. 3 provides: “That affected agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with agencies of local government to develop a system to facilitate verification of legal presence in furtherance of the provisions of this act, including but not limited to the ‘Systematic Alien Verification Entitlements Program’ operated by the Department of Homeland Security, which enables federal, state, and local government agencies to obtain immigration status information they need in order to determine an applicant/recipient’s eligibility for public benefits.”

§ 32.1-325.04.
Eligibility for medical assistance; individuals confined in state correctional facilities.

The Department shall coordinate with the Department of Corrections to identify persons in the custody of state correctional facilities who are currently enrolled in the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance or who may be eligible for services under the state plan for medical assistance upon release and shall, prior to the release of such persons, (i) review the eligibility of currently enrolled persons to ensure continued access to medical assistance upon release or (ii) enroll persons not previously enrolled who meet eligibility criteria in the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance services; however, no services under the state plan for medical assistance shall be furnished to any person while he is confined in a state correctional facility unless federal financial participation is available to pay for the cost of the services provided.

An individual who is enrolled in the Commonwealth’s program of medical assistance services at the time of release from the custody of a state correctional facility shall be eligible for services upon release and shall continue to be eligible for services under the state plan for medical assistance until such time as the person is determined to no longer be eligible for medical assistance.

History.

2022, c. 300.

§ 32.1-325.1.
Adverse initial determination of overpayment; appeals of agency determinations.

The Director shall make an initial determination as to whether an overpayment has been made to a provider in accordance with the state plan for medical assistance, the provisions of §

2.2-4019

and applicable federal law. The initial determination shall be issued within 180 days of the receipt of the appeal request. If the agency does not render a decision within 180 days, the decision is deemed to be in favor of the provider.

An appeal of the Director’s initial determination concerning provider reimbursement shall be heard in accordance with §

2.2-4020

of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4020

et seq.) and the state plan for medical assistance provided for in §

32.1-325

. The hearing officer appointed pursuant to §

2.2-4024

shall conduct the appeal and submit a recommended decision to the Director within 120 days of the agency’s receipt of the appeal request. The Director shall consider the parties’ exceptions and issue the final agency case decision within sixty days of receipt of the hearing officer’s recommended decision. If the Director does not render a final agency case decision within sixty days of the receipt of the hearing officer’s recommended decision, the decision is deemed to be in favor of the provider. The Director shall adopt the hearing officer’s recommended decision unless to do so would be an error of law or Department policy. Any final agency case decision in which the Director rejects a hearing officer’s recommended decision shall state with particularity the basis for rejection. Prior to a final agency case decision issued in accordance with §

2.2-4023

, the Director may not undertake recovery of any overpayment amount paid to the provider through offset or other means. Once a final determination of overpayment has been made, the Director shall undertake full recovery of such overpayment whether or not the provider disputes, in whole or in part, the initial or the final determination of overpayment. Interest charges on the unpaid balance of any overpayment shall accrue pursuant to §

32.1-313

from the date the Director’s determination becomes final. Nothing in §

32.1-313

shall be construed to require interest payments on any portion of overpayment other than the unpaid balance referenced herein.

The burden of proof in informal and formal administrative appeals is on the provider. The agency shall reimburse a provider for reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and costs associated with an informal or formal administrative appeal if the provider substantially prevails on the merits of the appeal and the agency’s position is not substantially justified, unless special circumstances would make an award unjust. In any case in which a provider has recovered attorneys’ fees and costs associated with an informal or formal administrative appeal, the provider shall not be entitled to recover those same attorneys’ fees and costs in a subsequent judicial proceeding.

Court review of final agency determinations concerning provider reimbursement shall be made in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). In any case in which a final determination of overpayment has been reversed in a subsequent judicial proceeding, the provider shall be reimbursed that portion of the payment to which he is entitled plus any applicable interest, within thirty days of the subsequent judicial order.

History.

1986, c. 441; 2000, c. 967.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 478, which enacted §

2.2-4024.2

pertaining to ex parte communications by a hearing officer during the pendency of a hearing, provided in cl. 2: “That nothing in this act shall be construed to contravene the express provisions of §

32.1-325.1

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 V 2, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-325

.1, Code of Virginia, the director shall issue an informal fact-finding conference decision concerning provider reimbursement in accordance with the State Plan for Medical Assistance, the provisions of §

2.2-4019

, Code of Virginia, and applicable federal law. The informal fact-finding conference decision shall be issued within 180 days of the receipt of the appeal request, except as provided herein. If the agency does not render an informal fact-finding conference decision within 180 days of the receipt of the appeal request or, in the case of a joint agreement to stay the appeal decision as detailed below, within the time remaining after the stay expires and the appeal timeframes resume, the decision is deemed to be in favor of the provider. An appeal of the director’s informal fact-finding conference decision concerning provider reimbursement shall be heard in accordance with §

2.2-4020

of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4020

et seq.) and the State Plan for Medical Assistance provided for in §

32.1-325

, Code of Virginia. The Department of Medical Assistance Services and the provider may jointly agree to stay the deadline for the informal appeal decision or for the formal appeal recommended decision of the Hearing Officer for a period of up to sixty (60) days to facilitate settlement discussions. If the parties reach a resolution as reflected by a written settlement agreement within the sixty-day period, then the stay shall be extended for such additional time as may be necessary for review and approval of the settlement agreement in accordance §

2.2-514

of the Code of Virginia. Once a final agency case decision has been made, the director shall undertake full recovery of such overpayment whether or not the provider disputes, in whole or in part, the informal fact-finding conference decision or the final agency case decision. Interest charges on the unpaid balance of any overpayment shall accrue pursuant to §

32.1-313

, Code of Virginia, from the date the Director’s agency case decision becomes final.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 967 rewrote this section.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia health law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 853 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 4.

§ 32.1-325.1:1.
Definitions; recovery of overpayment for medical assistance services.

For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:“Agreement” means any contract executed for the delivery of services to recipients of medical assistance pursuant to subdivision D 2 of §

32.1-325

.“Successor in interest” means any person as defined in §

1-230

having stockholders, directors, officers, or partners in common with a health care provider for which an agreement has been terminated.“Termination” means (i) the cessation of operations by a provider, (ii) the sale or transfer of the provider, (iii) the reorganization or restructuring of the health care provider, or (iv) the termination of an agreement by either party.

The Director of Medical Assistance Services shall collect by any means available to him at law any amount owed to the Commonwealth because of overpayment for medical assistance services. Upon making an initial determination that an overpayment has been made to the provider pursuant to §

32.1-325.1

, the Director shall notify the provider of the amount of the overpayment. Such initial determination shall be made within the earlier of (i) four years, or (ii) 15 months after filing of the final cost report by the provider subsequent to sale of the facility or termination of the provider. The provider shall make arrangements satisfactory to the Director to repay the amount due. If the provider fails or refuses to make arrangements satisfactory to the Director for such repayment or fails or refuses to repay the Commonwealth for the amount due for overpayment in a timely manner, the Director may devise a schedule for reducing the Medicaid reimbursement due to any successor in interest.

In any case in which the Director is unable to recover the amount due for overpayment pursuant to subsection B, he shall not enter into another agreement with the responsible provider or any person who is the transferee, assignee, or successor in interest to such provider unless (i) he receives satisfactory assurances of repayment of all amounts due or (ii) the agreement with the provider is necessary in order to ensure that Medicaid recipients have access to the covered services rendered by the provider.Further, to the extent consistent with federal and state law, the Director shall not enter into any agreement with a provider having any stockholder possessing a material financial interest, partner, director, officer, or owner in common with a provider which has terminated a previous agreement for participation in the medical assistance services program without making satisfactory arrangements to repay all outstanding Medicaid overpayment.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to successors in interest with respect to transfer of a medical care facility pursuant to contracts entered into before February 1, 1990.

History.

1990, c. 389; 1994, c. 669; 1999, c. 1024; 2005, c. 839.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, c. 1024, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective until receipt of a Section 1115 waiver from the Health Care Financing Administration in the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall apply for such waiver as soon as possible, but not later than December 31, 1999. If waiver approval is granted, implementation shall occur no later than three months following the date of the approval.” Waivers were received and implemented.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 313 V 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

32.1-325.1:1

, Code of Virginia, upon identifying that an overpayment for medical assistance services has been made to a provider, the Director, Department of Medical Assistance Services shall notify the provider of the amount of the overpayment. Such notification of overpayment shall be issued within the earlier of (i) four years after payment of the claim or other payment request, or (ii) four years after filing by the provider of the complete cost report as defined in the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ regulations, or (iii) 15 months after filing by the provider of the final complete cost report as defined in the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ regulations subsequent to sale of the facility or termination of the provider.”

The 1999 amendment

substituted “subdivision D 2” for “subsection C” in the definition of “Agreement.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “1-230” for “1-13.19” in the definition of “Successor in interest” in subsection A; and made a minor stylistic change.

Law Review.

For a review of administrative procedure in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 727 (1999).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Hospitals and Sanitariums, § 4.

§ 32.1-325.2.
Department is payor of last resort.

Insurers, including group health plans as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, self-insured plans, health services plans, service benefit plans, health maintenance organizations, managed care organizations, pharmacy benefits managers, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service, are prohibited from including any clause in health care contracts which would exclude enrolling an individual or in making any payment for benefits to the individual or on the individual’s behalf for health care when the individual is eligible for medical assistance.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall be the payor of last resort to any insurer, including a group health plan as defined in § 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, a self-insured plan, a health services plan, a service benefit plan, a health maintenance organization, a managed care organization, a pharmacy benefits manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service for persons eligible for medical assistance in the Commonwealth. The above entities, as a condition of doing business in the Commonwealth, shall comply with the requirements set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a) (25) (I) (i)-(iv).

To the extent the Department of Medical Assistance Services has made payment for medical services where a third party has a legal obligation to make payment for such services, the Commonwealth shall automatically acquire all rights to such payment from the third party.

To the extent the Department of Medical Assistance Services is permitted by law to obtain recoveries from third parties, actions at law for such recoveries shall be decided under the same laws, rules and standards including applicable bases of liability and defenses as would apply if the individual receiving the services had brought the action directly; provided that nothing herein shall affect the sovereign immunity of the Commonwealth.

The term “insurer” as used herein shall be deemed to include without limitation “insurance carriers.”

History.

1986, c. 550; 1994, c. 213; 1996, c. 851; 2007, c. 535.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1986 act having been

32.1-325.1

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 535, in subsection A, inserted “self-insured plans” preceding “health service plans” and “managed care organizations . . . health care item or service”; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “a self-insured plan” preceding “a health services plan” and substituted “a managed care organization . . . health care item or service” for “which contracts to pay health care costs” and added the last sentence and made related changes.

§ 32.1-325.3.
Disclosure or use of information for purpose not connected with medical assistance program; Department not subject to certain disclosure.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall promulgate regulations consistent with federal law to provide safeguards against the use or disclosure of information, including information provided to a managed care organization pursuant to §

32.1-330.5

, concerning applicants for and recipients of medical assistance services for any purpose that is not directly connected with the administration of the state plan for medical assistance services.

Information in the possession or control of the Department or a managed care organization pursuant to §

32.1-330.5

concerning applicants for and recipients of medical assistance services shall not be subject to disclosure through discovery in litigation to which the Department is not a necessary party, unless the appropriate circuit court, for good cause shown, shall order such disclosure.

History.

1989, c. 67; 1992, c. 107; 2018, c. 382.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 382 designated the former provisions as subsections A and B; in subsection A, inserted “including information provided to a managed care organization pursuant to §

32.1-330.5

”; in subsection B, inserted “or a managed care organization pursuant to §

32.1-330.5

”; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Research References. Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 9 Discovery. § 9.04 Privileges Against Discovery. Bryson.

§ 32.1-325.4.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who willfully violates or refuses, fails, or neglects to comply with any regulation or order of the Board or the Director promulgated pursuant to §

32.1-325.3

shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1989, c. 67.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 32.1-326.
Director may make payments to or for eligible persons in state-owned medical facilities.

The Director of Medical Assistance Services is authorized, subject to the state plan provided for in §

32.1-325

and any other regulations of the Board, to make payments to or on behalf of eligible persons in state-owned mental hospitals, nursing or geriatric units or other state-owned medical facilities.

History.

1984, c. 781.

§ 32.1-326.1.
Department to operate program of estate recovery.

In accordance with applicable federal law and regulations, including those under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, the Department shall operate a program of estate recovery for all persons who receive payments or on whose behalf payments are made for Medicaid-financed nursing facility care by the Department.
The amount recovered from the estate of a deceased recipient shall not exceed the amount of total Medicaid payments made on behalf of such recipient.

History.

1993, cc. 193, 700.

§ 32.1-326.2.
Pilot school/community health centers.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services, in cooperation with the Department of Education, shall, consistent with the biennium budget cycle, examine and may revise the funding and components of the pilot school/community health centers. Any revisions shall be designed to maximize access to health care for poor children, and to improve the funding by making use of every possible, cost-effective means, Medicaid reimbursement or program. Any revisions shall be focused on prevention of large costs for acute or medical care and may include, but not be limited to:

Funding sources and means of distribution for the state match which will clearly demonstrate that local governments are not funding the state match for these centers.

The benefits and drawbacks of allowing school divisions to provide services to disabled students as Medicaid providers.

The appropriate credentials of the providers of care in the school health centers, e.g., licensure by the Board of Education and compliance with federal requirements or licensure by a regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions.

Utilization of the individualized education plan, when signed by a physician, as the plan of care authorizing services.

Delivery of medically necessary services, such as rehabilitation services, psychiatric and psychological evaluations and therapy, transportation, and nursing.

Payment for Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment (EPSDT) services, with proper medical oversight, in consultation with the students’ primary care physicians.

The role of the Medallion and Options programs in regard to the school health centers and flexibility for school divisions regarding any required referrals.

Any funds necessary to support revisions to the school/community health center projects shall be included in the budget estimates for the departments, as appropriate.

History.

1996, c. 864.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1996 act having contained no section number.

§ 32.1-326.3.
Special education health services; memorandum of agreement between the Department of Education and the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services, in cooperation with the Department of Education, shall, consistent with the biennium budget cycle, examine and revise, as necessary, the regulations relating to the funding and components of special education services.Any revisions shall be designed to maximize access to health care for poor children who are eligible for medical assistance services and to assist school divisions in the funding of medically necessary related services by making use of every possible, cost-effective means, Medicaid reimbursement or other program administered by the Department of Medical Assistance Services, including, but not limited to, the State Children’s Health Insurance Plan pursuant to Title XXI of the United States Social Security Act, as approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration at the time. Any revisions shall be based on the flexibility allowed to the states and be focused on avoiding large costs for acute or medical care and increasing children’s access to health care, and shall include, but need not be limited to:

Rates for services which shall clearly identify that only the federal share shall be reimbursed for the special education health services and shall demonstrate that local governments are funding the state match for the special education health services provided by school divisions.

The benefits and drawbacks of allowing school divisions to provide services as Medicaid providers to disabled students.

The appropriate credentials of the providers of care, in compliance with federal requirements and with the approval of the Health Care Financing Administration, for special education health services; e.g., licensure by the Board of Education and licensure by the appropriate health regulatory board within the Department of Health Professions.

Delivery of medically necessary related services for students who are eligible for medical assistance services.The services shall be limited to those services which are covered under the then-current state plan for medical assistance services, and may be provided, consistent with federal law and as approved by the Health Care Financing Administration, by a school division participating as a health services provider. Such services shall include, but need not be limited to, speech therapy, including such services when delivered by school speech-language pathologists licensed by the Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology or those individuals who are directly supervised, at least twenty-five percent of the time, by such licensed speech-language pathologists; physical therapy; occupational therapy; psychiatric and psychological evaluations and therapy, including such services when delivered by school psychologists-limited licensed by the Board of Psychology; transportation between the student’s home, the school or other site where health-related services are to be provided on those days when the student is scheduled to receive such services at the school or such other site; and skilled nursing services, such as health assessments, screening activities, nursing appraisals, nursing assessments, nursing procedures, medication assessment, medication monitoring, and medication administration.

The role of the Medallion, Medallion II, Options or other managed care programs in regard to the special education health services and coordination with school divisions regarding any required referrals.

Any funds necessary to support revisions to the special education health services shall be included in the budget estimates for the departments, as appropriate.

The Director of the Department of Medical Assistance Services or his designee and the Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee shall develop and execute a memorandum of agreement relating to special education health services. This memorandum of agreement shall be revised on a periodic basis; however, the agreement shall, at a minimum, be revised and executed within six months of the inauguration of a new governor in order to maintain policy integrity.

The agreement shall include, but need not be limited to, (i) requirements for regular and consistent communications and consultations between the two departments and with school division personnel and officials and school board representatives; (ii) a specific and concise description and history of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), a summary of school division responsibilities pursuant to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, and a summary of any corresponding state law which influences the scope of these responsibilities; (iii) a specific and concise summary of the then-current Department of Medical Assistance Services regulations regarding the special education health services; (iv) assignment of the specific responsibilities of the two state departments for the operation of special education health services; (v) a schedule of issues to be resolved through the regular and consistent communications process, including, but not limited to, ways to integrate and coordinate care between the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ managed care providers and special education health services providers; (vi) a process for the evaluation of the services which may be delivered by school divisions participating as special education health services providers pursuant to Medicaid; (vii) a plan and schedule to reduce the administrative and paperwork burden of Medicaid participation on school divisions in Virginia; and (viii) a mechanism for informing primary care providers and other case management providers of those school divisions that are participating as Medicaid providers and for identifying such school divisions as Medicaid providers that are available to receive referrals to provide special education health services.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall cooperate with the Board of Education in developing a form to be included with the Individualized Education Plan (IEP) that shall be accepted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services as the plan of care (POC) and in collecting the data necessary to establish separate and specific Medicaid rates for the IEP meetings and other services delivered by school divisions to students.The POC form shall (i) be consistent with the plan of care required by the Department of Medical Assistance Services of other Medicaid providers, (ii) allow for written updates, (iii) be used by all school divisions participating as Medicaid providers of special education health services, (iv) document the student’s progress, and (v) be integrated and coordinated with the Department of Medical Assistance Services’ managed care providers.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services shall consult with the Department of Education in preparing a consent form which (i) is separate from the IEP, (ii) includes a statement noting that such form is not part of the student’s IEP, (iii) includes a release to authorize billing of school-based health services delivered to the relevant student by the school division, and (iv) shall be used by all school divisions participating in Medicaid reimbursement. This consent form shall be made available to the parents upon conclusion of the IEP meeting. The release shall allow for billing of school-based health services by Virginia school divisions to the Virginia Medicaid program and other programs operated by the Department of Medical Assistance Services.

The Department of Medical Assistance Services and the Department of Education shall also develop a cost-effective, efficient, and appropriate process to allow school divisions access to eligibility data for students for whom consent has been obtained.

The Board of Medical Assistance Services shall, when in compliance with federal law and regulation and approved by the Health Care Financing Administration, also (i) include, in its regulations which provide for reimbursement of school divisions participating in Medicaid as special education health services providers, a provision for reimbursement of mental health services delivered by licensed school psychologists-limited and a provision for reimbursement for services rendered to Medicaid-eligible students of speech-language pathology services delivered by school speech-language pathologists or those individuals who are directly supervised, at least twenty-five percent of the time, by such licensed speech-language pathologists; (ii) revise the limitations, established pursuant to relevant regulations and Virginia’s state plan for medical assistance services, on services delivered by school divisions participating in Medicaid as special education health services providers, in effect on January 1, 1999, for physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech, hearing, and language disorders when such services are rendered to children who are eligible for special education services and have IEPs requiring such services; (iii) cooperate with the Board of Education in developing a form to be included with the IEP that shall be accepted by the Department of Medical Assistance Services as the plan of care when signed by a physician or, when under such physician’s supervision, his designee; (iv) cooperate with the Board of Education in collecting the data necessary to establish separate and specific rates for the IEP services delivered by school divisions to students with disabilities who are eligible for special education and for medical assistance services; and (v) analyze the data necessary for such rates and establish new rates for reimbursement of IEP meetings based on such data.

Services delivered by school divisions as participating providers in the Medicaid program or any other program operated by the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall not include any family planning, pregnancy or abortion services.

History.

1999, cc. 967, 1005; 2002, c. 457; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 250.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 250, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Medical Assistance Services shall provide technical assistance to the Department of Education and local school divisions to facilitate their understanding of and compliance with federal ordering, referring, and prescribing (ORP) provider screening and enrollment requirements.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 457 inserted “between the student’s home, the school or other site where health-related services are to be provided on those days when the student is scheduled to receive such services at the school or such other site” in the final sentence of the second paragraph of subdivision A 4.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 250, effective July 1, 2021, in the second paragraph of subsection A, deleted “and are disabled and have been identified as eligible for special education” following “medical assistance services” in the first sentence; in subdivision A 4, deleted “special education” preceding “students” in the first paragraph and in the first sentence of the second paragraph, deleted “required by the student’s Individualized Education Plan (IEP), shall be” following “services which are” and “special education” preceding “health services provider” at the end.

§ 32.1-327.
Claim against indigent’s estate for payments made.

In accordance with applicable federal law and regulations, including those under Title XIX of the Social Security amendments of 1965, the Department may make claim against the estate of an indigent or medically indigent person for the amount of any medical assistance payments made on his behalf by the Department. The Department may waive its claim if it determines that enforcement of the claim would result in substantial hardship to the heirs or dependents of the individual against whose estate the claim exists.

History.

1984, c. 781.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1984 act having been

32.1-326.1

.

§ 32.1-328.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 428, cl. 2.

§ 32.1-329.
Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 728, effective July 1, 2000.